Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0137.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 233. (1) If the owner of a registered vehicle transfers or assigns the title or interest in the vehicle, the registration plates issued for the vehicle shall must be removed and transferred to the owner's spouse, mother, father, sister, brother, or child to whom title or interest in the vehicle is transferred, or retained and preserved by the owner for transfer to another vehicle upon on application and payment of the required fees. A person shall not transfer the plates to a vehicle without applying for a proper certificate of registration describing the vehicle to which the plates are being transferred, except as provided in section 217(4). If the owner of a registered vehicle acquires another vehicle without transferring or assigning the title or interest in the vehicle for which the plates were issued, the owner may have the plates transferred to the subsequently acquired vehicle upon on application and payment of the required fees. (2) A person shall not purchase or lease another vehicle or an interest in another vehicle with the intent to circumvent the restrictions created by immobilization of a vehicle under this act. (3) A person shall not transfer or attempt to transfer ownership or right of possession of a vehicle subject to forfeiture or ordered forfeited under this act with the intent to avoid the forfeiture of that vehicle. (4) During the time a vehicle is subject to a temporary registration plate, vehicle forfeiture, immobilization, registration denial, or the period from adjudication to immobilization or forfeiture under this act, a person shall not without a court order transfer or assign the title or an interest in the vehicle to a person who that is not subject to payment of a use tax under section 3 of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.93. (5) A person who that violates subsection (2), (3), or (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (6) A person An individual whose operator's or chauffeur's license is suspended, revoked, or denied for, or who has never been licensed by this state and was convicted for, a third or subsequent violation of section 625 or 625m, of a local ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625 or 625m, or of a law of another state substantially corresponding to section 625 or 625m, or for a fourth or subsequent suspension or revocation under section 904 shall not purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire a motor vehicle during the suspension, revocation, or denial period. A person An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (7) If the assigned holder of registration plates applies for a new registration certificate, the application shall must be accompanied either by the old registration certificate or by a certificate of title showing the person to be the assigned holder of the registration plates for which the old registration certificate had been issued. A person who that fails or neglects to fulfill the requirements of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (8) The Except for a title issued electronically under section 222, the owner shall indorse endorse on the certificate of title as required by the secretary of state an assignment of the title with warranty of title in the form printed on the certificate with a statement of all security interests in the vehicle or in accessories on the vehicle and deliver or cause the certificate to be mailed or delivered to the purchaser or transferee at the time of the delivery to the purchaser or transferee of the vehicle. The certificate shall must show the payment or satisfaction of any security interest as shown on the original title. However, as provided under section 238, the secretary of state is not required to issue a title to the owner of a vehicle if the title is subject to a security interest. (9) Upon On the delivery of a motor vehicle and the transfer, sale, or assignment of the title or interest in a motor vehicle by a person, including a dealer, the effective date of the transfer of title or interest in the vehicle is the date of signature on either the application for title or the assignment of the certificate of title by the purchaser, transferee, or assignee. (10) A secured receipt that is in a form approved by the department and produced at the time the secured interest is presented with payment in satisfaction of the security interest may be submitted to the department in lieu of the title for purposes of transferring ownership in the vehicle. Sec. 234. (1) The Except for a title issued electronically under section 222, the purchaser or transferee, unless the person is a licensed dealer, shall present or cause to be presented the certificate of title and registration certificate if plates are being transferred to another vehicle, assigned as provided in this act, to the secretary of state accompanied by the fees as provided by law, whereupon a new certificate of title and registration certificate shall must be issued to the assignee. The certificate of title shall must be mailed or delivered to the owner or another person the owner may direct in a separate instrument in a form prescribed by the secretary of state. shall prescribe. (2) If the secretary of state mails or delivers a purchaser's or transferee's certificate of title to a dealer, the dealer shall mail or deliver that certificate of title to the purchaser or transferee not more than 5 days after receiving the certificate of title from the secretary of state. (3) Unless the transfer is made and the fee paid within 15 days, the vehicle is considered to be without registration, the secretary of state may repossess the license plates, and transfer of the vehicle ownership may be effected and a valid registration acquired thereafter only upon on payment of a transfer fee of $15.00 in addition to the fee provided for in section 806. (4) If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of the transfer, the parties shall comply with the requirements of section 238. Sec. 239. A Except for a title issued electronically under section 222, a person shall not fail or neglect to properly endorse and deliver a certificate of title to a transferee or owner lawfully entitled to the title. A person who that violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction and shall may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. Sec. 240. (1) The owner of a motor vehicle who has made a bona fide sale by transfer of his or her the owner's title or interest and, except for a title issued electronically under section 222, who has delivered possession of the vehicle and the certificate of title to that vehicle properly endorsed to the purchaser or transferee is not liable for any damages or a violation of law that subsequently results from the use or ownership of the vehicle by another, if the owner, other than a licensed dealer, satisfies the conditions prescribed under subsection (2). (2) The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a licensed dealer, shall satisfy 1 of the following conditions: (a) Accompany the purchaser of the vehicle to a secretary of state branch office to assure that the title of the vehicle being sold is transferred. (b) Maintain a record of the sale for not less than 18 months. As used in this subdivision, "record of the sale" means either a photocopy of the reassigned title or a form or document that includes the name, address, driver license number, and signature of the person to whom the vehicle is sold and the purchase price and date of sale of the vehicle. (3) A person who that violates subsection (2) is responsible for a civil infraction and shall may be ordered to pay a civil fine of $15.00. (4) A person who that violates subsection (2) is presumed to be the last titled owner and to be liable for towing fees and daily storage fees for an abandoned motor vehicle.